North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12P. Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.140.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 18 members as follows:

Nine members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The President Pro Tempore shall appoint members proportionally according to the partisan composition of the Senate.

Nine members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Speaker shall appoint members proportionally according to the partisan composition of the House.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on January 15 of each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment and end on January 15 of the next odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until his or her successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2008-150, s. 1(a).

§ 120-70.141.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee shall examine, on a continuing basis, election administration and campaign finance regulation in North Carolina, in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve elections administration and campaign finance regulation. In this examination, the Committee shall do the following:

Study the budgets, programs, and policies of the State Board of Elections and the county boards of elections to determine ways in which the General Assembly may improve election administration.

(1a)

Study the budgets, programs, and policies of the State Board of Elections and the county boards of elections to determine ways in which the General Assembly may improve campaign finance regulation.

Examine election statutes and court decisions to determine any legislative changes that are needed to improve election administration and campaign finance regulation.

Study other states’ initiatives in election administration and campaign finance regulation to provide an ongoing commentary to the General Assembly on these initiatives and to make recommendations for implementing similar initiatives in North Carolina; and

Study any other election matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

2008-150, s. 1(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 6; 2017-6, ss. 2, 3, 8; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes, in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(1a), “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections.”

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 8, effective April 1, 2017, in subdivision (a)(1), substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” and deleted “and campaign finance regulation” at the end; and added subdivision (a)(1a).

§ 120-70.142.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is 10 members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

2008-150, s. 1(a).

§ 120-70.143.
Additional powers.

The Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee, while in discharge of official duties, shall have access to any paper or document and may compel the attendance of any State official or employee before the Committee or secure any evidence under

G.S. 120-19

. In addition,

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

shall apply to the proceedings of the Committee as if it were a joint committee of the General Assembly.

History.

2008-150, s. 1(a).